West Virginia, session 2026, SB200.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 19. AGRICULTURE. ARTICLE 20. DOGS AND CATS. §19-20-24. Causing injury or death to police dogs and other public safety animals used by law-enforcement officials or by fire prevention or investigation officials; criminal penalties. [Repealed.] CHAPTER 61. CRIMES AND THEIR PUNISHMENT. ARTICLE 2. CRIMES AGAINST THE PERSON. §61-2-10b. Malicious assault; unlawful assault; battery; and assault on governmental representatives, health care providers, utility workers, law-enforcement officers, correctional employees and emergency medical service personnel; definitions; penalties. (a) For purposes of this section:(1) “Government representative” means any officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision thereof, or a person under contract with a state agency or political subdivision of this state.(2) “Health care worker” means any nurse, nurse practitioner, physician, physician assistant, or technician practicing at, and all persons employed by or under contract to a hospital, county, or district health department, long-term care facility, physician’s office, clinic, or outpatient treatment facility.(3) “Emergency service personnel” means any paid or volunteer firefighter, emergency medical technician, paramedic, or other emergency services personnel employed by or under contract with an emergency medical service provider or a state agency or political subdivision thereof.(4) “Utility worker” means any individual employed by a public utility or electric cooperative or under contract to a public utility, electric cooperative, or interstate pipeline.(5) “Law-enforcement officer” has the same definition as this term is defined in §30-29-1 of this code, except for purposes of this section, “law-enforcement officer” additionally includes those individuals defined as “chief executive” in §30-29-1 of this code.(6) “Correctional employee” means any individual employed by the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the West Virginia Regional Jail Authority, and the West Virginia Division of Juvenile Services and an employee of an entity providing services to incarcerated, detained, or housed persons pursuant to a contract with such agencies.(b) Malicious assault. — Any person who maliciously shoots, stabs, cuts, or wounds or by any means causes bodily injury with intent to maim, disfigure, disable, or kill a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee, or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity, and the person committing the malicious assault knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than three nor more than 15 years.(c) Unlawful assault. — Any person who unlawfully but not maliciously shoots, stabs, cuts, or wounds or by any means causes a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee, or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity bodily injury with intent to maim, disfigure, disable, or kill him or her and the person committing the unlawful assault knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be imprisoned in a state correctional facility for not less than two nor more than five years.(d) Battery. — Any person who unlawfully, knowingly, and intentionally makes physical contact of an insulting or provoking nature with a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee, or law-enforcement officer acting in his or her official capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, or unlawfully and intentionally causes physical harm to that person acting in such capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than one year nor more than three years, or both fined and imprisoned. If any person commits a second such offense, he or she is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than two years nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned. Any person who commits a third violation of this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $2,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than five years nor more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned.(e) Assault. — Any person who unlawfully attempts to commit a violent injury to the person of a government representative, health care worker, utility worker, emergency service personnel, correctional employee, or law-enforcement officer, acting in his or her official capacity and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, or unlawfully commits an act which places that person acting in his or her official capacity in reasonable apprehension of immediately receiving a violent injury and the person committing the battery knows or has reason to know that the victim is acting in his or her official capacity, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be  imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than one year nor more than three years or fined not more than $200, or both fined and imprisoned. (f) Any person convicted of any crime set forth in this section who is incarcerated in a facility operated by the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the West Virginia Regional Jail Authority, or is in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Services and is at least 18 years of age or subject to prosecution as an adult, at the time of committing the offense and whose victim is a correctional employee may not be sentenced in a manner by which the sentence would run concurrent with any other sentence being served at the time the offense giving rise to the conviction of a crime set forth in this section was committed. ARTICLE 5. CRIMES AGAINST public justice. §61-5-30. Causing death or injury to public safety animals; criminal penalties; right of self-defense; exception; and restitution. (a) As used in this section:"Public safety animal" means a dog and any other animal specifically trained to assist public safety officers or persons working under the direction of, or in cooperation with, public safety officers in the performance of their official duties;"Public safety officer" means a law-enforcement officer, fire prevention or investigation officer, correctional officer, or emergency services officer;"Physical injury" means substantial physical pain or temporary impairment of the animal’s ability to physically function as a public service animal; and"Serious physical injury" means bodily injury that causes serious or prolonged physical injury or permanent impairment of the animal’s ability to function as a public service animal.(b) Any person who willfully causes physical injury to a public safety animal under the control of a public safety officer acting in his or her official capacity, and the person committing the act knows or has reason to know that the public safety animal is acting in its official capacity is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $200 nor more than $1,000 or confined in jail for not more than one year, or both fined and confined.(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, any person who willfully causes serious physical injury to a public safety animal under the control of a public safety officer acting in his or her official capacity, and the person committing the act knows or has reason to know that the public safety animal is acting in its official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $1,000 nor more than $3,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for an indeterminate term of not less than one year nor more than five years, or both fined and imprisoned.(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) or (c) of this section, any person who willfully causes the death of a public safety animal under the control of a public safety officer acting in his or her official capacity, and the person committing the act knows or has reason to know that the public safety animal is acting in its official capacity is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $2,000 nor more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility for an indeterminate term of not less than two years nor more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned.(e) The right of self-defense may be exercised by a person charged with a criminal violation of this section.(f) The provisions of this section do not apply to a person who euthanizes an injured, ill, or infirm public safety animal as part of his or her official duties.(g) The provisions of §61-11A-4 of this code relating to court-ordered restitution are applicable to persons convicted of a violation of this section.The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home